Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 1 Water Quality Control Act
69-3-135. Request for hearing. [Current version. See second version of section and its Compiler’s Notes.]

A written request for a hearing before the board of water quality, oil and gas on the stop work order must be filed by the operator with the commissioner of environment and conservation within thirty (30) days of receipt of notice. If a hearing is requested, the operator shall also be afforded the opportunity to meet with the commissioner of environment and conservation or, at the commissioner's option, the deputy or assistant commissioner, within three (3) working days after the hearing request is filed to discuss the alleged violation and show cause why a stop work order should not have been issued. Any modification or revocation of the stop work order shall be in writing. If the commissioner or such designee upholds the stop work order, it shall remain in effect until resolution of the appeal or the operator comes into compliance. If no request for hearing is made within thirty (30) days of the receipt of notice, the stop work order becomes final and not subject to review.

Acts 2000, ch. 680, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 986, §§ 26-28 amended §69-3-104 to substitute “board of water quality, oil and gas” for “board of water quality control”.

69-3-135. Request for hearing. [Contingent amendment. See first version of section and Compiler’s Notes.]

A written request for a hearing before the board on the stop work order must be filed by the operator with the commissioner of environment and conservation within thirty (30) days of receipt of notice. If a hearing is requested, the operator shall also be afforded the opportunity to meet with the commissioner of environment and conservation or, at the commissioner's option, the deputy or assistant commissioner, within three (3) working days after the hearing request is filed to discuss the alleged violation and show cause why a stop work order should not have been issued. Any modification or revocation of the stop work order shall be in writing. If the commissioner or such designee upholds the stop work order, it shall remain in effect until resolution of the appeal or the operator comes into compliance. If no request for hearing is made within thirty (30) days of the receipt of notice, the stop work order becomes final and not subject to review.

Acts 2000, ch. 680, § 4; 2018, ch. 839, § 31.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 986, §§ 26-28 amended §69-3-104 to substitute “board of water quality, oil and gas” for “board of water quality control”.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall take effect, including for purposes of rulemaking, upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment deleted “of water quality, oil and gas” following “before the board” near the beginning of the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [Contingent. See Compiler’s Notes.]

69-3-136. Failure to give notice — Failure to comply with stop work order.

Failure of an operator to give the notice required by §69-3-134 or to comply with a stop work order issued pursuant to §§69-3-133 and69-3-135 shall subject the operator to the penalties in §69-3-115(a)(1)(E).

Acts 2000, ch. 680, § 5.

69-3-137. Pollution notification form.

The department of environment and conservation and the department of agriculture shall devise a form to be used to notify the departments of a situation in which a person alleges that pollution has resulted or will result from a forestry operation that may have violated the Water Quality Control Act, compiled in this chapter.

This form, together with instructions and information concerning the preferred method and locations for filing such notices, shall be prominently displayed and maintained in a downloadable form on the internet websites maintained by each department. The form and instructions shall be simple and informative and shall avoid the use of technical terms. Any toll-free number available to accept public inquiries or complaints concerning pollution from silvicultural activity shall also be displayed.

The departments shall continue to accept notifications and requests for investigation of silvicultural activities by telephone, in writing, and when feasible by electronic mail. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require that any notice or requests for investigation of a silvicultural activity must be on the form that is prepared pursuant to this section or that any notice to a department or any complaint must meet any technical requirement.

Acts 2000, ch. 849, § 1.

69-3-138. Timber harvesting. [See contingent amendment to subdivision (a)(2) and the Compiler’s Notes.]

Whenever a person contracts in writing with a master logger to conduct any type of timber harvesting on the person's property, the master logger shall assume sole liability for compliance with this chapter for a period of one (1) year after the timber harvest is completed; provided, that the master logger gives written certification to the person that the master logger has designed a plan of best management practices (BMPs) to ensure compliance with all applicable water pollution control laws and that the master logger will install, maintain and adhere to established BMPs to ensure erosion and sediment controls to protect waters of the state in all harvesting activities on the property.

[Current version. See second version for contingent amendment and Compiler’s Notes.]

The master logger shall not be responsible for the negligent or intentional acts of the landowner or any third party when such actions are the cause of a water quality violation. Actions and appeals resulting from a violation issued by the department shall be heard by the board of water quality, oil and gas established in § 69-3-104, in accordance with the procedures established by the board and in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

[Contingent amendment. See the Compiler’s Notes.]

As used in this section, “master logger” means a person who is identified by the division of forestry of the department of agriculture as having completed all requirements of the Tennessee master logger program or a master logger program of substantially equal rigor provided in another state, including, but not limited to, maintaining all current continuing education requirements.

The master logger shall not be responsible for the negligent or intentional acts of the landowner or any third party when such actions are the cause of a water quality violation. Actions and appeals resulting from a violation issued by the department shall be heard by the board, in accordance with the procedures established by the board and in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2005, ch. 268, § 1; 2018, ch. 839, § 32.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 986, §§ 26-28 amended §69-3-104 to substitute “board of water quality, oil and gas” for “board of water quality control”.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall take effect, including for purposes of rulemaking, upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment deleted “of water quality, oil and gas established in §69-3-104” preceding “in accordance with” in (a)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [Contingent. See Compiler’s Notes.]

69-3-139. Stop work orders for coal surface mining operations. [See contingent amendment to subsection (c) and the Compiler’s Notes.]

The commissioner is authorized to issue stop work orders for coal surface mining operations in accordance with subsections (b) and (c).

When certain coal surface mining activities have polluted waters of the state as a result of an operator's failure or refusal to comply with permit conditions, the commissioner may issue a stop work order to the operator. The stop work order shall specify those parts of the coal surface mining activities on site that are contributing to the pollution that must stop. The stop work order shall remain in effect until the department determines that the operator has installed or repaired all necessary measures to comply with the permit so that further pollution associated with the surface mining activities will not occur.

[Current version. See second version for contingent amendment and Compiler’s Notes.]

A written request for a hearing before the board of water quality, gas, and oil on the stop work order must be filed by the operator to the commissioner within thirty (30) days of receipt of notice. If the operator files that request and also makes a specific request for an informal meeting with the commissioner to show cause why the stop work order should not have been issued, then the commissioner or, at the commissioner's option, the deputy or assistant commissioner, shall meet with the operator within three (3) working days after the hearing request is filed. Any modification or revocation of the stop work order shall be in writing. If the commissioner or the commissioner's designee upholds the stop work order, it shall remain in effect until resolution of the appeal or until the operator comes into compliance. If no request for hearing is made within thirty (30) days of the receipt of notice, the stop work order becomes final and not subject to review.

[Contingent amendment. See the Compiler’s Notes.]

Failure of an operator to comply with a stop work order issued pursuant to this section shall subject the operator to the penalties in § 69-3-115.

A written request for a hearing before the board on the stop work order must be filed by the operator to the commissioner within thirty (30) days of receipt of notice. If the operator files that request and also makes a specific request for an informal meeting with the commissioner to show cause why the stop work order should not have been issued, then the commissioner or, at the commissioner's option, the deputy or assistant commissioner, shall meet with the operator within three (3) working days after the hearing request is filed. Any modification or revocation of the stop work order shall be in writing. If the commissioner or the commissioner's designee upholds the stop work order, it shall remain in effect until resolution of the appeal or until the operator comes into compliance. If no request for hearing is made within thirty (30) days of the receipt of notice, the stop work order becomes final and not subject to review.

Acts 2006, ch. 594, § 1; 2018, ch. 839, § 33.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 986, §§ 26-28 amended §69-3-104 to substitute “board of water quality, oil, and gas” for “board of water quality control”.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall take effect, including for purposes of rulemaking, upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment deleted “of water quality, gas, and oil” preceding “on the stop work order” near the beginning of (c) in the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [Contingent. See Compiler’s Notes.]

69-3-140. Collection of water samples — Report.

In collecting water samples drawn to test the water quality of the Pigeon River at the time the river enters Tennessee from Haywood County, North Carolina, the department shall draw samples from the river within one quarter (¼) mile of the border separating Tennessee and North Carolina in the center of the river. The samples shall be drawn at a time when any power plant that emits discharges into the Pigeon River and that is located within one (1) mile of the state border is running at least one (1) generator. The samples shall be drawn in addition to collecting samples at any other location the department deems appropriate to test the water quality of the river.

The results of water samples drawn pursuant to subdivision (a)(1) shall be reported independently of any other water samples drawn to test the quality of the Pigeon River and shall be incorporated by the department in any analysis of the river's water quality. The samples shall at a minimum be analyzed for apparent and true color in accordance with United States environmental protection agency methods and evaluated against Tennessee water quality standards approved by the United States environmental protection agency.

The department is authorized to obtain a generation schedule from the power plant in order to facilitate timing the drawing of samples and may contract with local rafting entities for transportation services related to the taking of samples pursuant to subsection (a).

Acts 2008, ch. 767, § 1.

69-3-141. Bill of rights for permit applicants.

The general assembly finds and adopts as a matter of public policy, the following statements:

The permitting process under this chapter should be a predictable, ordinary process for the benefit of the commissioner and permit applicants alike;

As with all governmental regulatory activity, the permitting process under this chapter should be susceptible to easy public review and scrutiny;

The permitting process under this chapter should afford applicants basic due process, including notice of application defects, timely review of applications, and prompt and meaningful administrative and judicial review of permitting decisions;

The permitting process under this chapter should reflect an appropriate balance between enforcement of the state's environmental laws and the rights of persons seeking to comply voluntarily with those same laws, in order to safeguard our state's environment and develop our state's economy; and

To further these goals, to protect the rights of applicants, and to promote efficient, effective resolution of permit applications by the commissioner, the general assembly enacts this bill of rights for permit applicants under this chapter.

The commissioner shall afford each applicant for a permit under this chapter the following rights under this bill of rights for permit applicants:

Permit applicants shall have the right to assistance from the department in understanding regulatory and permit requirements;

Permit applicants shall have the right to know the projected fees for review of applications, and how any costs will be determined and billed;

Permit applicants shall have the right to access, on the department's website, complete and clearly written guidance documents, office of general counsel opinions, and department policies that explain the department's regulatory jurisdiction and requirements. The commissioner shall publish, on the department's website, a list of all information required in a permit application and the criteria used to determine whether the submitted information is adequate;

Permit applicants shall have the right to timely completeness determinations for their applications. Permit applicants shall have the right to know exactly how their applications are incomplete and what further information is needed to make their applications complete. Absent extraordinary circumstances, the commissioner shall notify the applicant within thirty (30) days of any permit application deficiencies, or determine that the application is complete;

Permit applicants shall have the right to a timely decision on their permit application. The following time limits shall apply:

Aquatic resource alteration permits (ARAPs) shall be issued or denied within ninety (90) days of the date the department determines an application is complete. If a public hearing is scheduled in response to a request from interested parties, an additional ninety (90) days shall be added to the allowable time limit. The ninety-day time limit may be extended by written mutual agreement between the commissioner and the permit applicant;

Applications for the reissuance of national pollutant discharge elimination system (NPDES) permits shall be issued or denied within one hundred eighty (180) days of the date the department determines an application is complete. If a public hearing is scheduled, in response to comments by interested parties, additional time is requested by the applicant, or additional time is requested by the EPA, an additional ninety (90) days shall be added to the allowable time limit;

Applications for new or modified NPDES permits shall be issued or denied within three hundred sixty-five (365) days of the date the department determines an application is complete. If a public hearing is scheduled, in response to comments by interested parties or additional time is requested by the EPA, an additional ninety (90) days shall be added to the allowable time limit. No other extension shall be granted, except by written mutual agreement between the commissioner and the permit applicant;

Permit applicants shall have the right to appeal to the board any permit review time limits that have been violated without good cause. Through this appeal, applicants may obtain a set date for a decision on their permit and, where the board finds good cause, appropriate relief, including, but not limited to, a refund of all application fees; and

Permit applicants shall have the right to know who will be reviewing their application and the time required to complete the full review process.

Acts 2008, ch. 854, § 1.

69-3-142. Annual reports by commissioner.

The commissioner shall submit by January 31 of each year to the chair of the energy, agriculture and natural resources committee of the senate and the chair of the agriculture and natural resources committee of the house of representatives the following information:

The number of enforcement orders, including directors' orders and commissioner's orders, issued pursuant to § 69-3-109(a)(1) and (2) during the prior year, listed by the county in which the violation occurred;

The number of orders that become final pursuant to § 69-3-109(a)(3) during the prior year, including the average civil penalties and damages assessed by the department from these orders;

The number of final orders and consent orders by the board that become final pursuant to § 69-3-110(c), including the average civil penalties and damages assessed by the department from these decisions during the prior year; and

The number of complaints filed in any chancery court of this state appealing a decision by the board, pursuant to § 69-3-111, and any judicial proceedings initiated by the commissioner and the attorney general and reporter, pursuant to § 69-3-117, during the prior year.

The commissioner shall submit by January 31 of each year to the chair of the energy, agriculture and natural resources committee of the senate and the chair of the agriculture and natural resources committee of the house of representatives the following information:

The number of individual permit applications made during the prior year, listed by county in which the activity sought to be permitted was to occur;

The average length of time, in days, between date of individual permit application and the date permit applications are deemed complete by the department during the prior year; and

The average length of time, in days, between date of individual permit application and the date the department grants or denies the permit application during the prior year.

For purposes of this section, “permit application” and “permit applications” shall be defined to include applications for individual permits issued pursuant to § 69-3-108.

The commissioner shall submit by January 31 of each year to the chair of the energy, agriculture and natural resources committee of the senate and the chair of the agriculture and natural resources committee of the house of representatives a brief report on the status of the implementation of a secure web portal for the submittal of online permit applications. This service for electronic submittal of permit applications will comply with the federal guidelines contained in 40 CFR Ch. I, Subch. A, Part 3, Cross-Media Electronic Reporting Rule (CROMERR). This reporting requirement will terminate after a secure online permit application submittal system is implemented.

Acts 2008, ch. 1014, § 1; 2012, ch. 604, § 19; 2013, ch. 236, § 10.

69-3-143. Rock harvesting operations.

Sections69-3-143 —69-3-147 shall govern rock harvesting operations as defined in §69-3-144.

Acts 2011, ch. 341, § 3.

69-3-144. Definitions for §§ 69-3-143 — 69-3-147.

As used in §§69-3-143 —69-3-147, unless the context otherwise requires:

As used for the purposes of rock harvesting under §§ 69-3-143 — 69-3-147 only, “mineral” means dimension stone, flagstone, fieldstone, landscaping stone, drystack stone, fagade and marble, but does not include any other “mineral” as defined in § 59-8-202;

“Operator” means any person engaged in rock harvesting who disturbs or intends to disturb one (1) acre or more of land or removes or intends to remove more than one hundred (100) tons of minerals as defined in subdivision (1). Any operator who has obtained a permit and otherwise complied with this part may subcontract any part or all of the rock harvesting area covered by the permit to the extent that such subcontractors meet all the qualifications and requirements of this part; and

“Rock harvesting” means the removal of minerals, as defined in subdivision (1), by an operator with or without machinery.

Acts 2011, ch. 341, § 3.

69-3-145. Required permit or notice of coverage under a general permit — Construction regarding adjudication of property rights disputes.

No operator shall engage in rock harvesting without having first obtained from the commissioner a permit or notice of coverage under a general permit as required in § 69-3-108 and the regulations promulgated pursuant thereto. At least thirty (30) days prior to engaging in rock harvesting on any land in which the right to engage in rock harvesting has been severed from the ownership of the land surface, the operator shall send the owner of the surface, by certified mail, return receipt required, a copy of the permit or notice of coverage from the department. The operator shall forward copies of all records relating to the certified mailing to the department. All costs associated with the certified mailing and transmission of records to the department shall be borne by the operator.

The granting of a permit shall be subject to payment by the operator of the fee prescribed in title 68, chapter 203, and upon submission to the department of the following information:

Evidence of the operator's legal right to harvest the minerals on the land affected by the permit;

Proof of general liability and, if applicable, workers' compensation insurance coverage. The general liability policy shall be in an amount of no less than one million dollars ($1,000,000). Proof of coverage shall be provided to the department prior to issuance of the permit;

Proof of the registration with the department of revenue of the operator and any subcontractors;

All application forms, maps, calculations and narratives required to satisfy § 69-3-108 and the regulations issued pursuant thereto; and

A reclamation/stabilization plan which addresses backfilling, grading and revegetation of the site. The reclamation plan will be followed as operations proceed with the overburden and waste materials from succeeding cuts being utilized in the reclamation of preceding cuts. The overburden and waste material from the first cut may be utilized for access road construction. The plan shall provide for returning the affected area as close as is reasonable in the circumstances to its preharvesting state, considering the available overburden and other factors.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the commissioner to adjudicate property rights disputes.

Acts 2011, ch. 341, § 3.

69-3-146. Stop-work orders. [See contingent amendment to subsection (c) and the Compiler’s Notes.]

The commissioner is authorized to issue stop-work orders for rock harvesting operations in accordance with this section.

When rock harvesting activities have polluted waters of the state as a result of an operator's knowing violation of permit conditions, or an operator has failed or refused to obtain permit coverage as required in § 69-3-145, the commissioner may issue a stop-work order to the operator. The stop-work order shall specify those parts of the rock harvesting activities on site that are contributing to the pollution or require ceasing work until permit coverage is obtained. The stop-work order shall remain in effect until the department determines that the operator has obtained permit coverage and/or has taken all necessary measures to comply with the permit so that further pollution associated with the rock harvesting operations will not occur.

[Current version. See second version for contingent amendment and Compiler’s Notes.]

A written request for a hearing before the board of water quality, oil and gas on the stop-work order shall be filed by the operator with the commissioner within thirty (30) days of the receipt of notice. If the operator files the request and also makes a specific request for an informal meeting with the commissioner to show cause why the stop-work order should not have been issued, the commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall meet with the operator within three (3) working days after the hearing request is filed. Any modification or revocation of the stop-work order shall be in writing. If the commissioner or the commissioner's designee upholds the stop-work order, it shall remain in effect until resolution of the appeal or until the operator comes into compliance. If no request for a hearing is made within thirty (30) days of the receipt of notice, the stop-work order shall be final and shall not be subject to review. In such case, the operator shall stabilize the site within sixty (60) days of the receipt of notice.

[Contingent amendment. See the Compiler’s Notes.]

Failure of an operator to comply with a stop-work order issued pursuant to this section shall subject the operator to another violation of this part in addition to any other violations the operator has committed that is subject to the penalties prescribed in § 69-3-115. The commissioner may also institute proceedings for the confiscation and forfeiture of equipment used in any rock harvesting operation to which a stop-work order has been issued. Such proceedings may be instituted in the chancery court of Davidson County, or in the chancery court of the county in which all or part of the rock harvesting operation is located.

A written request for a hearing before the board on the stop-work order shall be filed by the operator with the commissioner within thirty (30) days of the receipt of notice. If the operator files the request and also makes a specific request for an informal meeting with the commissioner to show cause why the stop-work order should not have been issued, the commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall meet with the operator within three (3) working days after the hearing request is filed. Any modification or revocation of the stop-work order shall be in writing. If the commissioner or the commissioner's designee upholds the stop-work order, it shall remain in effect until resolution of the appeal or until the operator comes into compliance. If no request for a hearing is made within thirty (30) days of the receipt of notice, the stop-work order shall be final and shall not be subject to review. In such case, the operator shall stabilize the site within sixty (60) days of the receipt of notice.

Acts 2011, ch. 341, § 3; 2018, ch. 839, § 34.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 986, §§ 26-28 amended §69-3-104 to substitute “board of water quality, oil and gas” for “board of water quality control”.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall take effect, including for purposes of rulemaking, upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment deleted “of water quality, gas, and oil” preceding “on the stop-work order” near the beginning of (c) in the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [Contingent. See Compiler’s Notes.]

69-3-147. Rock harvesting governance.

Except where a specific provision of §§69-3-143 —69-3-147 is applicable, rock harvesting is subject to and shall be governed by this part.

Acts 2011, ch. 341, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 341, § 4 provided that notwithstanding any law to the contrary, where an owner of surface and mineral rights to real property enters into a contract for the conveyance of mineral rights in such property resulting in a severance of such interests, the parties to such conveyance shall identify the specific mineral interests to be conveyed to the purchaser of the mineral rights. The purchaser of the mineral interests shall identify such interests purchased by providing a deed reference number in accordance with §67-5-804(c) for the mineral interest with the property assessor in the county in which the interests are located as prescribed in this section. For the purposes of this section, “specific mineral interests” means only those minerals listed in the deed as contemplated by the parties. All rights to minerals not described in the deed shall remain with the surface owner. The provisions of this section shall apply to all contracts entered into on or after July 1, 2011, and shall not impair the obligation of any existing contract or be construed to direct courts in determining the intent of the parties who entered into a contract prior to such date.

69-3-148. Municipal separate storm sewer systems becoming qualified local programs.

The department may establish a program under which municipal separate storm sewer systems may become qualified local programs allowing for the streamlining of permits for construction activity as provided in this section.

The department may review and approve applications from municipal separate storm sewer systems to become qualified local programs. The requirements for being a qualified local program shall be those required by federal regulation together with a system acceptable to the department for sharing information as to the construction sites authorized by the qualified local program.

The department may incorporate by reference the requirements of a qualified local program for construction activity in its general permit.

An operator of a construction site located within the jurisdiction of a qualified local program under subsection (b) who has obtained a notice of coverage from such program shall be authorized under the department's general permit for storm water associated with construction activity for that site and shall not have to submit any of the following to the department:

Notice of intent to seek coverage under a storm water construction permit;

Storm water pollution prevention plan;

Storm water construction permit fee; or

Notice of termination.

Acts 2012, ch. 1019, § 2.